Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIV Descent, Wills, and Administration of Decedents’ Estates
Verified Report of Property — Examination of Records

393A.550.
Verified report of property.

If a person does not file a report required by KRS

393A.220

or the administrator believes that a person may have filed an inaccurate, incomplete, or false report, the administrator may require the person to file a verified report in a form prescribed by the administrator. The verified report shall:

State whether the person is holding property reportable under this chapter;

Describe property not previously reported or about which the administrator has inquired;

Specifically identify property described under subsection (2) of this section about which there is a dispute whether it is reportable under this chapter; and

State the amount or value of the property.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 55, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.560.
Examination of records to determine compliance.

The administrator, at reasonable times and on reasonable notice, may:

Examine the records of a person, including examination of appropriate records in the possession of an agent of the person under examination, if the records are reasonably necessary to determine whether the person has complied with this chapter;

Issue an administrative subpoena requiring the person or agent of the person to make records available for examination; and

Bring an action seeking judicial enforcement of the subpoena.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 56, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.570.
Administrative regulations for conducting examination.

The administrator shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A governing procedures and standards for an examination under KRS

393A.560

, including rules for use of an estimation, extrapolation, and statistical sampling in conducting an examination.

An examination under KRS

393A.560

shall be performed under administrative regulations promulgated under subsection (1) of this section and with generally accepted examination practices and standards applicable to an unclaimed-property examination.

If a person subject to examination under KRS

393A.560

has filed the reports required under KRS

393A.220

and

393A.550

and has retained the records required by KRS

393A.250

, the following shall apply to the examination:

The examination shall include a review of the person’s records;

The examination shall not be based on an estimate unless the person expressly consents in a record to the use of an estimate; and

The person conducting the examination shall consider the evidence presented in good faith by the person in preparing the findings of the examination under KRS

393A.610

.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 57, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.580.
Records obtained in examination.

Records obtained and records, including work papers, compiled by the administrator in the course of conducting an examination under KRS

393A.560

:

Shall be subject to the confidentiality and security provisions of KRS

393A.770

to

393A.830

and are not public records;

May be used by the administrator in an action to collect property or otherwise enforce this chapter;

May be used in a joint examination conducted with another state, the United States, a foreign country or subordinate unit of a foreign country, or any other governmental entity if the governmental entity conducting the examination is legally bound to maintain the confidentiality and security of information obtained from a person subject to examination in a manner substantially equivalent to KRS

393A.770

to

393A.830

;

Shall be disclosed, on request, to the person that administers the unclaimed property law of another state for that state’s use in circumstances equivalent to circumstances described in this KRS

393A.550

to

393A.650

, if the other state is required to maintain the confidentiality and security of information obtained in a manner substantially equivalent to KRS

393A.770

to

393A.830

;

Shall be produced by the administrator under an administrative or judicial subpoena or administrative or court order; and

Shall be produced by the administrator on request of the person subject to the examination in an administrative or judicial proceeding relating to the property.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 58, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.590.
Evidence of unpaid debt or undischarged obligation.

A record of a putative holder showing an unpaid debt or undischarged obligation shall be prima facie evidence of the debt or obligation.

A putative holder may establish by a preponderance of the evidence that there is no unpaid debt or undischarged obligation for a debt or obligation described in subsection (1) of this section or that the debt or obligation was not, or no longer is, a fixed and certain obligation of the putative holder.

A putative holder may overcome prima facie evidence under subsection (1) of this section by establishing by a preponderance of the evidence that a check, draft, or similar instrument was:

Issued as an unaccepted offer in settlement of an unliquidated amount;

Issued but later was replaced with another instrument because the earlier instrument was lost or contained an error that was corrected;

Issued to a party affiliated with the issuer;

Paid, satisfied, or discharged;

Issued in error;

Issued without consideration;

Issued but there was a failure of consideration;

Voided not later than ninety (90) days after issuance for a valid business reason set forth in a contemporaneous record; or

Issued but not delivered to the third-party payee for a sufficient reason recorded within a reasonable time after issuance.

In asserting a defense under this section, a putative holder may present evidence of a course of dealing between the putative holder and the apparent owner or of custom and practice.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 59, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.600.
Failure of person examined to retain records.

If a person subject to examination under KRS

393A.560

does not retain the records required by KRS

393A.250

, the administrator may determine the value of property due using a reasonable method of estimation based on all information available to the administrator, including extrapolation and use of statistical sampling when appropriate and necessary, consistent with examination procedures and standards adopted under KRS

393A.570

.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 60, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.610.
Report to person whose records were examined.

At the conclusion of an examination under KRS

393A.560

, the administrator shall provide to the person whose records were examined a complete and unredacted examination report that specifies:

The work performed;

The property types reviewed;

The methodology of any estimation technique, extrapolation, or statistical sampling used in conducting the examination;

Each calculation showing the value of property determined to be due; and

The findings of the person conducting the examination.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 61, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.620.
Complaint to administrator about conduct of person conducting examination.

If a person subject to examination under KRS

393A.560

believes the person conducting the examination has made an unreasonable or unauthorized request or is not proceeding expeditiously to complete the examination, the person in a record may ask the administrator to intervene and take appropriate remedial action, including countermanding the request of the person conducting the examination, imposing a time limit for completion of the examination, or reassigning the examination to another person.

If a person in a record requests a conference with the administrator to present matters that are the basis of a request under subsection (1) of this section, the administrator shall hold the conference not later than thirty (30) days after receiving the request. The administrator may hold the conference in person, by telephone, or by electronic means.

If a conference is held under subsection (2) of this section, not later than thirty (30) days after the conference ends, the administrator shall provide a report in a record of the conference to the person that requested the conference.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 62, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.630.
Administrator’s contract with another to conduct examination.

As used in this section, “related to the administrator” means an individual who is:

The administrator’s spouse, partner in a civil union, domestic partner, or reciprocal beneficiary;

The administrator’s child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, sibling, stepsibling, half-sibling, aunt, uncle, niece, or nephew;

A spouse, partner in a civil union, domestic partner, or reciprocal beneficiary of an individual in paragraph (b) of this subsection; or

Any individual residing in the administrator’s household.

The administrator may contract with a person to conduct an examination under KRS

393A.550

to

393A.650

.

If the person with whom the administrator contracts under subsection (2) of this section is:

An individual, the individual shall not be related to the administrator; or

A business entity, the entity shall not be owned in whole or in part by the administrator or an individual related to the administrator.

If the administrator contracts with a person under subsection (2) of this section:

The contract may provide for compensation of the person based on a fixed fee, hourly fee, or contingent fee;

A contingent fee arrangement shall not provide for a payment that exceeds ten percent (10%) of the amount or value of property paid or delivered as a result of the examination; and

On request by a person subject to examination by a contractor, the administrator shall deliver to the person a complete and unredacted copy of the contract and any contract between the contractor and a person employed or engaged by the contractor to conduct the examination.

A contract under subsection (2) of this section shall be subject to KRS

61.870

to

61.884

.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 63, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.640.
Limit of future employment.

The administrator or an individual employed by the administrator who participates in, recommends, or approves the award of a contract under KRS

393A.630

on or after July 14, 2018, shall not be employed by, contract with, or compensated in any capacity by the contractor or an affiliate of the contractor for two (2) years after the latest of participation in, recommendation of, or approval of the award or conclusion of the contract.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 64, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.650.
Determination of liability for unreported reportable property.

If the administrator determines from an examination conducted under KRS

393A.560

that a putative holder failed or refused to pay or deliver to the administrator property which is reportable under this chapter, the administrator shall issue a determination of the putative holder’s liability to pay or deliver and give notice in a record to the putative holder of the determination.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 65, effective July 14, 2018.